North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 2. Judicial Notice.

Rule 201.
Judicial notice of adjudicative facts.

Scope of rule. — This rule governs only judicial notice of adjudicative facts.

Kinds of facts. — A judicially noticed fact must be one not subject to reasonable dispute in that it is either (1) generally known within the territorial jurisdiction of the trial court or (2) capable of accurate and ready determination by resort to sources whose accuracy cannot reasonably be questioned.

When discretionary. — A court may take judicial notice, whether requested or not.

When mandatory. — A court shall take judicial notice if requested by a party and supplied with the necessary information.

Opportunity to be heard. — In a trial court, a party is entitled upon timely request to an opportunity to be heard as to the propriety of taking judicial notice and the tenor of the matter noticed. In the absence of prior notification, the request may be made after judicial notice has been taken.

Time of taking notice. — Judicial notice may be taken at any stage of the proceeding.

Instructing jury. — In a civil action or proceeding, the court shall instruct the jury to accept as conclusive any fact judicially noticed. In a criminal case, the court shall instruct the jury that it may, but is not required to, accept as conclusive any fact judicially noticed.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 201, except subdivision (e) which is discussed below. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“This is the only evidence rule on the subject of judicial notice. It deals only with judicial notice of ‘adjudicative’ facts. No rule deals with judicial notice of ‘legislative’ facts. * * *

The omission of any treatment of legislative facts results from fundamental differences between adjudicative facts and legislative facts. Adjudicative facts are simply the facts of the particular case. Legislative facts, on the other hand, are those which have relevance to legal reasoning and the lawmaking process, whether in the formulation of a legal principle or ruling by a judge or court or in the enactment of a legislative body. * * *

What, then, are ‘adjudicative’ facts? Davis refers to them as those ‘which relate to the parties,’ or more fully:

‘ When a court or an agency finds facts concerning the immediate parties — who did what, where, when, how, and with what motive or intent — the court or agency is performing an adjudicative function, and the facts are conveniently called adjudicative facts. . . .

‘Stated in other terms, the adjudicative facts are those to which the law is applied in the process of adjudication. They are the facts that normally go to the jury in a jury case. They relate to the parties, their activities, their properties, their businesses.’ 2 Administrative Law Treatise 353.”

Current North Carolina law does not deal with procedure for taking judicial notice of facts. Judicial notice of domestic and foreign law is dealt with in § Chapter 8, Article 1, which remains in force.

Subdivision (b) concerns the kinds of facts that may be judicially noticed. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“With respect to judicial notice of adjudicative facts, the tradition has been one of caution in requiring that the matter be beyond reasonable controversy. This tradition of circumspection appears to be soundly based, and no reason to depart from it is apparent.”

Subdivision (b) is consistent with current North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 11 (1982).

Subdivisions (c) and (d) govern when judicial notice is discretionary and when it is mandatory. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Under subdivision (c) the judge has a discretionary authority to take judicial notice, regardless of whether he is so requested by a party. The taking of judicial notice is mandatory, under subdivision (d), only when a party requests it and the necessary information is supplied. This scheme is believed to reflect existing practice. It is simple and workable. It avoids troublesome distinctions in the many situations in which the process of taking judicial notice is not recognized as such.”

Subdivisions (c) and (d) are in accord with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 11 (1982).

Subdivision (e) entitles a party, upon timely request, to an opportunity to be heard as to the propriety of taking judicial notice. It differs from the federal rule by its limitation to a trial court. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Basic considerations of procedural fairness demand an opportunity to be heard on the propriety of taking judicial notice and the tenor of the matter noticed. The rule requires the granting of that opportunity upon request. No formal scheme of giving notice is provided. An adversely affected party may learn in advance that judicial notice is in contemplation, either by virtue of being served with a copy of a request by another party under subdivision (d) that judicial notice be taken, or through an advance indication by the judge. Or he may have no advance notice at all. The likelihood of the latter is enhanced by the frequent failure to recognize judicial notice as such. And in the absence of advance notice, a request made after the fact could not in fairness be considered untimely.”

Subdivision (e) departs from current North Carolina practice which generally does not require an opportunity to be heard prior to the court taking judicial notice on its own initiative. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 11 (1982).

With respect to notice at administrative hearings, see G.S. 150A-30 [150B-30].

Subdivision (f) is in accord with North Carolina practice in allowing judicial notice to be taken at any stage of the proceedings, whether in the trial court or on appeal.

Subdivision (g) concerns instructing the jury with respect to judicially noticed facts. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Within its relatively narrow area of adjudicative facts, the rule contemplates there is to be no evidence before the jury in disproof. The judge instructs the jury to take judicially noticed facts as established. This position is justified by the undesirable effects of the opposite rule in limiting the rebutting party, though not his opponent, to admissible evidence, in defeating the reasons for judicial notice, and in affecting the substantive law to an extent and in ways largely unforeseeable. Ample protection and flexibility are afforded by the broad provision for opportunity to be heard on request, set forth in subdivision (e).”

Subdivision (g) is in accord with North Carolina practice in civil cases by not allowing evidence to be introduced to dispute a fact that has been judicially noticed. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 11, at 34 (1982).

However, subdivision (g) differs from North Carolina practice by permitting evidence to be introduced in a criminal trial to rebut a fact that has been judicially noticed. In adopting subdivision (g), Congress was of the view that a mandatory instruction to a jury in a criminal case to accept as conclusive any fact judicially noticed is contrary to the spirit of the right to a jury trial.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “A New Paradigm for Understanding Judicial Notice and its Implications in the Modern Digital Age,” see 9 Elon L. Rev. 267 (2017).